Illinois, session 104th, SB340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 10. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 6    Section 11. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is 8controlled by, or is under common control with another legal 9entity. As used in this definition, "control" or "controlled" 10means: ownership of or the power to vote more than 50% of the 11outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a 12company; control in any manner over the election of a majority 13of the directors or of individuals exercising similar 14functions; or the power to exercise a controlling influence 15over the management of a company.16    "Authenticate" means to use reasonable means to determine 17that a request to exercise any of the rights under subsection 18(b) of Section 14 is being made by or rightfully on behalf of 19the consumer who is entitled to exercise the rights with 20respect to the personal data at issue.21    "Biometric identifier" has the same meaning given to that 22term in the Biometric Information Privacy Act.23    "Biometric information" has the same meaning given to that   SB0340 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1term in the Biometric Information Privacy Act.2    "Child" has the meaning given in United States Code, Title 315, Section 6501.4    "Collect" means to buy, rent, obtain, lease, access, 5receive, or otherwise acquire personal data in any manner.6    "Consent" means any freely given, specific, informed, and 7unambiguous indication of the consumer's wishes by which the 8consumer signifies agreement to the processing of personal 9data relating to the consumer. Acceptance of general or broad 10terms of use or similar document that contains descriptions of 11personal data processing along with other, unrelated 12information does not constitute consent. Hovering over, 13muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content does not 14constitute consent. A consent is not valid when the consumer's 15indication has been obtained by a dark pattern. A consumer may 16revoke consent previously given consistent with this Act.17    "Consumer" means a natural person who is an Illinois 18resident acting only in an individual or household context. 19Consumer does not include a natural person acting in a 20commercial or employment context.21    "Controller" means the natural or legal person who, alone 22or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of 23the processing of personal data.24    "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant 25effects concerning the consumer" means decisions made by the 26controller that result in the provision or denial by the   SB0340 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1controller of financial or lending services, housing, 2insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal 3justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or 4access to essential goods or services.5    "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or 6manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or 7impairing user autonomy, decision-making, or choice. 8    "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably be 9used to infer information about or otherwise be linked to an 10identified or identifiable natural person or a device linked 11to an identified or identifiable natural person, provided that 12the controller that possesses the data:13        (1) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data 14    cannot be associated with a natural person;15        (2) publicly commits to process the data only in a 16    deidentified fashion and not attempt to reidentify the 17    data; and18        (3) contractually obligates any recipients of the 19    information to comply with all provisions of this 20    definition.21    "Delete" means to remove or destroy information so that it 22is not maintained in human- or machine-readable form and 23cannot be retrieved or used in the ordinary course of 24business.25    "Genetic information" has the meaning ascribed to the term 26under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act   SB0340 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1of 1996 as specified in 45 CFR 160.103.2    "Identified or identifiable natural person" means a person 3who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly.4    "Known child" means a person under circumstances in which 5a controller has actual knowledge of, or willfully disregards, 6that the person is under 13 years of age.7    "Personal data" means any information that is linked or 8reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural 9person. "Personal data" does not include deidentified data, 10pseudonymous data, or publicly available information. As used 11in this definition, "publicly available information" means 12information that (1) is lawfully made available from federal, 13state, or local government records or (2) a controller has a 14reasonable basis to believe has lawfully been made available 15to the general public.16    "Process" or "processing" means any operation or set of 17operations that are performed on personal data or on sets of 18personal data, whether or not by automated means, including, 19but not limited to, the collection, use, storage, disclosure, 20analysis, deletion, sharing, retention, organizing, 21structuring, or modification of personal data.22    "Processor" means a natural or legal person who processes 23personal data on behalf of a controller.24    "Profiling" means any form of automated processing of 25personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal 26aspects related to an identified or identifiable natural   SB0340 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1person's economic situation, health, personal preferences, 2interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements. 3Profiling does not include automated processing used solely 4for independent measurement.5    "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be 6attributed to a specific natural person without the use of 7additional information, provided that the additional 8information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate 9technical and organizational measures to ensure that the 10personal data are not attributed to an identified or 11identifiable natural person.12    "Sale", "sell", or "sold" means the exchange of personal 13data for monetary or other valuable consideration by the 14controller, processor, or an affiliate of the controller or 15processor to a third party. "Sale" does not include the 16following:17        (1) the disclosure of personal data to a processor who 18    processes the personal data on behalf of the controller if 19    limited to the purposes of processing;20        (2) the disclosure of personal data to a third party 21    for purposes of providing a product or service requested 22    by the consumer;23        (3) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an 24    affiliate of the controller; 25        (4) the disclosure of information that the consumer 26    intentionally made available to the general public via a   SB0340 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    channel of mass media and did not restrict to a specific 2    audience; or3        (5) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a 4    third party as an asset that is part of a completed or 5    proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other 6    transaction in which the third party assumes control of 7    all or part of the controller's assets.8    "Sensitive data" is a form of personal data. "Sensitive 9data" means:10        (1) personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin, 11    religious beliefs, mental or physical health condition or 12    diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or 13    immigration status;14        (2) the processing of biometric identifiers or 15    information or genetic information for the purpose of 16    uniquely identifying an individual;17        (3) the personal data of a known child;18        (4) specific geolocation data;19        (5) information that reveals the status of 20    identifiable natural person as a victim of a crime; or21        (6) a government-issued identifier, including a social 22    security number, passport number, or a driver's license 23    number, that is not required by law to be displayed in 24    public.25    "Specific geolocation data" means information derived from 26technology, including, but not limited to, global positioning   SB0340 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other 2mechanisms that can precisely and accurately identify the 3specific location of a consumer or a device linked with a 4consumer within a radius of 1,750 feet. Specific geolocation 5data does not include the content of communications, the 6contents of databases containing street address information 7that are accessible to the public as authorized by law, or any 8data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering 9infrastructure systems or other equipment for use by a public 10utility.11    "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements to 12a consumer or to a device linked to a consumer in which the 13advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained or 14inferred from the consumer's activities over time and across 15nonaffiliated websites or online applications to predict the 16consumer's preferences or interests. Targeted advertising does 17not include:18        (1) advertising based on activities within a 19    controller's own websites or online applications;20        (2) advertising based on the context of a consumer's 21    current search query or visit to a website or online 22    application;23        (3) advertising to a consumer in response to the 24    consumer's request for information or feedback; or25        (4) processing personal data solely for measuring or 26    reporting content and advertising performance, reach, or   SB0340 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    frequency, including independent measurement.2    (z) "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public 3authority, agency, or body other than the consumer, 4controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the 5controller.6    (aa) "Trade secret" has the same meaning given to the term 7in the Illinois Trade Secrets Act. 8    Section 12. Scope; exclusions. 9    (a)(1) Scope. This Act applies to legal entities that 10conduct business in Illinois or produce products or services 11that are targeted to Illinois residents, and that satisfy one 12or more of the following thresholds:13        (A) during a calendar year, collects or processes 14    personal data of 100,000 consumers or more, excluding 15    personal data controlled or processed solely for the 16    purpose of completing a payment transaction; or17        (B) derives over 25% of gross revenue from the sale of 18    personal data and processes or collects personal data of 19    25,000 consumers or more.20    (2) A controller or processor shall comply with the 21Student Online Personal Protection Act, except that if the 22provisions of that Act conflict with this Act, the Student 23Online Personal Protection Act prevails.24    (3) All legal entities shall comply with the Biometric 25Information Privacy Act and the Genetic Information Privacy   SB0340 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1Act.2    (b) Exclusions. The provisions of this Act do not apply to 3the following entities, activities, or types of information:4        (1) the State, a political subdivision of the State, 5    units of local government, and school districts;6        (2) a federally recognized Indian tribe;7        (3) information that meets the definition of:8            (A) protected health information, as defined by 9        and for purposes of the Health Insurance Portability 10        and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, 11        and related regulations;12            (B) health records, that includes, but is not 13        limited to, any information, whether oral or recorded 14        in any form or medium, that relates to the past, 15        present, or future physical or mental health or 16        condition of a patient; the provision of health care 17        to a patient; or the past, present, or future payment 18        for the provision of health care to a patient;19            (C) patient identifying information for purposes 20        of Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, Part 2, 21        established pursuant to the United States Code, Title 22        42, Section 290dd-2;23            (D) identifiable private information for purposes 24        of the federal policy for the protection of human 25        subjects, the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 45, 26        Part 46; identifiable private information that is   SB0340 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        otherwise information collected as part of human 2        subjects research under the good clinical practice 3        guidelines issued by the International Council for 4        Harmonisation; the protection of human subjects under 5        the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 21, Parts 50 6        and 56; or personal data used or shared in research 7        conducted in accordance with one or more of the 8        requirements set forth in this paragraph;9            (E) information and documents created for purposes 10        of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 11        1986, Public Law 99-660, and related regulations; or12            (F) patient safety work product for purposes of 13        Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, Part 3, 14        established under the United States Code, Title 42, 15        Sections 299b-21 to 299b-26;16        (4) information that is derived from any of the health 17    care-related information listed in clause (3), but that 18    has been deidentified in accordance with the requirements 19    for deidentification set forth in the Code of Federal 20    Regulations, Title 45, Part 164; 21        (5) information originating from, and intermingled to 22    be indistinguishable with, any of the health care-related 23    information listed in clause (3) that is maintained by:24            (A) a covered entity or business associate, as 25        defined by the Health Insurance Portability and 26        Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and   SB0340 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        related regulations to the extent the entity is acting 2        as a covered entity or business associate under the 3        Privacy and Security rules issued by the United States 4        Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 5        164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations;6            (B) a health care provider, to include, but not be 7        limited to, any public or private facility that 8        provides, on an inpatient or outpatient basis, 9        preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, convalescent, 10        rehabilitation, mental health, or intellectual 11        disability services, including general or special 12        hospitals, skilled nursing homes, extended care 13        facilities, intermediate care facilities and mental 14        health centers; or15            (C) a program or a qualified service organization, 16        as defined by Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, 17        Part 2, established pursuant to United States Code, 18        Title 42, Section 290dd-2;19        (6) information that is:20            (A) maintained by an entity that meets the 21        definition of health care provider under the Code of 22        Federal Regulations, Title 45, Section 160.103, to the 23        extent that the entity maintains the information in 24        the manner required of covered entities with respect 25        to protected health information for purposes of the 26        Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of   SB0340 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        1996, Public Law 104-191, and related regulations;2            (B) included in a limited data set, as described 3        under the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 45, Part 4        164.514(e), to the extent that the information is 5        used, disclosed, and maintained in the manner 6        specified by that part;7            (C) maintained by, or maintained to comply with 8        the rules or orders of, a self-regulatory organization 9        as defined by the United States Code, Title 15, 10        Section 78c(a)(26) or of a registered futures 11        association as designated under the United States 12        Code, Title 7, Section 21;13            (D) originated from, or intermingled with, 14        information described in clause (9) and that a 15        residential mortgage originator or residential 16        mortgage servicer regulated under the Residential 17        Mortgage License Act of 1987 collects, processes, 18        uses, or maintains in the same manner as required 19        under the laws and regulations specified in clause 20        (9); or21            (E) originated from, or intermingled with, 22        information described in clause (9) and that a nonbank 23        financial institution collects, processes, uses, or 24        maintains in the same manner as required under the 25        laws and regulations specified in clause (9);26        (7) information used only for public health activities   SB0340 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    and purposes, as described under the Code of Federal 2    Regulations, Title 45, Part 164.512;3        (8) an activity involving the collection, maintenance, 4    disclosure, sale, communication, or use of any personal 5    data bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit 6    standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, 7    personal characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer 8    reporting agency, as defined in the United States Code, 9    Title 15, Section 1681a(f), by a furnisher of information, 10    as set forth in the United States Code, Title 15, Section 11    1681s-2, who provides information for use in a consumer 12    report, as defined in the United States Code, Title 15, 13    Section 1681a(d), and by a user of a consumer report, as 14    set forth in the United States Code, Title 15, Section 15    1681b, except that information is only excluded under this 16    paragraph to the extent that the activity involving the 17    collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, 18    or use of the information by the agency, furnisher, or 19    user is subject to regulation under the federal Fair 20    Credit Reporting Act, United States Code, Title 15, 21    Sections 1681 to 1681x, and the information is not 22    collected, maintained, used, communicated, disclosed, or 23    sold except as authorized by the Fair Credit Reporting 24    Act;25        (9) financial institutions, their affiliates, and 26    personal data subject to the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley   SB0340 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Act, Public Law 106-102, and implementing regulations; 2        (10) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 3    disclosed pursuant to the federal Driver's Privacy 4    Protection Act of 1994, United States Code, Title 18, 5    Sections 2721 to 2725, if the collection, processing, 6    sale, or disclosure is in compliance with that law;7        (11) personal data regulated by the federal Family 8    Educational Rights and Privacy Act, United States Code, 9    Title 20, Section 1232g, and implementing regulations;10        (12) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 11    disclosed pursuant to the federal Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12    as amended, United States Code, Title 12, Sections 2001 to 13    2279cc, and implementing regulations, Code of Federal 14    Regulations, Title 12, Part 600, if the collection, 15    processing, sale, or disclosure is in compliance with that 16    law;17        (13) data collected or maintained:18            (A) in the course of an individual acting as a job 19        applicant to or an employee, owner, director, officer, 20        medical staff member, or contractor of a business if 21        the data is collected and used solely within the 22        context of the role;23            (B) as the emergency contact information of an 24        individual under item (A) if used solely for emergency 25        contact purposes; or26            (C) that is necessary for the business to retain   SB0340 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        to administer benefits for another individual relating 2        to the individual under item (1) if used solely for the 3        purposes of administering those benefits;4        (14) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 5    disclosed under the Illinois Insurance Code;6        (15) data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed as 7    part of a payment-only credit, check, or cash transaction 8    where no data about consumers, as defined in Section 11, 9    are retained;10        (16) a State or federally chartered bank or credit 11    union, or an affiliate or subsidiary that is principally 12    engaged in financial activities, as described in the 13    United States Code, Title 12, Section 1843(k);14        (17) information that originates from, or is 15    intermingled so as to be indistinguishable from, 16    information described in clause (8) and that a person 17    collects, processes, uses, or maintains in the same manner 18    as is required under the laws and regulations specified in 19    clause (8);20        (18) an insurance company and an insurance producer 21    that are regulated by the State under the Illinois 22    Insurance Code, a third-party administrator of 23    self-insurance, or an affiliate or subsidiary of any 24    entity identified in this clause that is principally 25    engaged in financial activities, as described in the 26    United States Code, Title 12, Section 1843(k), except that   SB0340 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    this clause does not apply to a person that, alone or in 2    combination with another person, establishes and maintains 3    a self-insurance program that does not otherwise engage in 4    the business of entering into policies of insurance;5        (19) a small business, as defined by the United States 6    Small Business Administration under the Code of Federal 7    Regulations, Title 13, Part 121, except that a small 8    business identified in this clause is subject to Section 9    17;10        (20) a nonprofit organization that is established to 11    detect and prevent fraudulent acts in connection with 12    insurance; and13        (21) an air carrier subject to the federal Airline 14    Deregulation Act, Public Law 95-504, only to the extent 15    that an air carrier collects personal data related to 16    prices, routes, or services and only to the extent that 17    the provisions of the Airline Deregulation Act preempt the 18    requirements of this Act.19    Controllers that are in compliance with the Children's 20Online Privacy Protection Act, United States Code, Title 15, 21Sections 6501 to 6506, and implementing regulations, are 22deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental 23consent under this Act. 24    Section 13. Responsibility according to role. 25    (a) Controllers and processors are responsible for meeting   SB0340 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1the respective obligations established under this Act.2    (b) Processors are responsible under this Act for adhering 3to the instructions of the controller and assisting the 4controller to meet the controller's obligations under this 5Act. Assistance under this subsection shall include the 6following:7        (1) taking into account the nature of the processing, 8    the processor shall assist the controller by appropriate 9    technical and organizational measures, insofar as this is 10    possible, for the fulfillment of the controller's 11    obligation to respond to consumer requests to exercise 12    their rights under Section 14; and13        (2) taking into account the nature of processing and 14    the information available to the processor, the processor 15    shall assist the controller in meeting the controller's 16    obligations in relation to the security of processing the 17    personal data and in relation to the notification of a 18    breach of the security of the system under the Illinois 19    Personal Information Protection Act and provide 20    information to the controller necessary to enable the 21    controller to conduct and document any data privacy and 22    protection assessments required by Section 18.23    (c) A contract between a controller and a processor shall 24govern the processor's data processing procedures with respect 25to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The 26contract shall be binding on both parties and clearly set   SB0340 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1forth instructions for processing data, the nature and purpose 2of processing, the type of data subject to processing, the 3duration of processing, and the rights and obligations of both 4parties. The contract shall also require that the processor:5        (1) ensure that each person processing the personal 6    data is subject to a duty of confidentiality with respect 7    to the data;8        (2) engage a subcontractor only under a written 9    contract in accordance with this subsection (c) that 10    requires the subcontractor to meet the obligations of the 11    processor with respect to the personal data;12        (3) at the choice of the controller, delete or return 13    all personal data to the controller as requested at the 14    end of the provision of services, unless retention of the 15    personal data is required by law;16        (4) upon a reasonable request from the controller, 17    make available to the controller all information necessary 18    to demonstrate compliance with the obligations in this 19    Act; and20        (5) allow for, and contribute to, reasonable 21    assessments and inspections by the controller or the 22    controller's designated assessor. Alternatively, the 23    processor may arrange for a qualified and independent 24    assessor to conduct, at least annually and at the 25    processor's expense, an assessment of the processor's 26    policies and technical and organizational measures in   SB0340 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    support of the obligations under this Act. The assessor 2    must use an appropriate and accepted control standard or 3    framework and assessment procedure for assessments as 4    applicable and provide a report of an assessment to the 5    controller upon request.6    (d) Taking into account the context of processing, the 7controller and the processor shall implement appropriate 8technical and organizational measures to ensure a level of 9security appropriate to the risk and establish a clear 10allocation of the responsibilities between the controller and 11the processor to implement the technical and organizational 12measures.13    (e) In no event shall any contract relieve a controller or 14a processor from the liabilities imposed on a controller or 15processor by virtue of the controller's or processor's roles 16in the processing relationship under this Act. Notwithstanding 17any other provision of this Act, if a processor processes data 18under a binding contract that sets forth the processing 19instructions and limits the actions the processor may take 20with respect to the data it processes on behalf of the 21controller, the processor is not liable for the controller's 22actions that led to a violation of this Act.23    (f) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller 24or processor with respect to a specific processing of data is a 25fact-based determination that depends upon the context in 26which personal data are to be processed. A person that is not   SB0340 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1limited in the person's processing of personal data pursuant 2to a controller's instructions, or that fails to adhere to a 3controller's instructions, is a controller and not a processor 4with respect to a specific processing of data. A processor 5that continues to adhere to a controller's instructions with 6respect to a specific processing of personal data remains a 7processor. If a processor begins, alone or jointly with 8others, determining the purposes and means of the processing 9of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect 10to the processing. 11    Section 14. Consumer personal data rights. 12    (a)(1) Consumer rights provided. Except as provided in 13this Act, a controller must comply with a request to exercise 14the consumer rights provided in this subsection (a).15    (2) A consumer has the right to confirm whether or not a 16controller is processing personal data concerning the consumer 17and access the personal data the controller is processing.18    (3) A consumer has the right to correct inaccurate 19personal data concerning the consumer taking into account the 20nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing 21of the personal data.22    (4) A consumer has the right to delete personal data 23concerning the consumer.24    (5) A consumer has the right to obtain personal data 25concerning the consumer, which the consumer previously   SB0340 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1provided to the controller, in a portable and, to the extent 2technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the 3consumer to transmit the data to another controller without 4hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated 5means.6    (6) A consumer has the right to opt out of the processing 7of personal data concerning the consumer for purposes of: (i) 8targeted advertising, (ii) the sale of personal data, or (iii) 9profiling in furtherance of automated decisions that produce 10legal effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant 11effects concerning a consumer.12    (7) A consumer has a right to obtain general descriptions 13of categories of third parties to which the controller has 14disclosed the consumer's personal data, unless such a list of 15specific third parties is readily available to the controller.16    (b)(1) Exercising consumer rights. A consumer may exercise 17the rights set forth in subsection (a) by submitting a 18request, at any time, to a controller specifying which rights 19the consumer wishes to exercise.20    (2) In the case of processing personal data concerning a 21known child, the parent or legal guardian of the known child 22may exercise the rights under this Act on the child's behalf.23    (3) In the case of processing personal data concerning a 24consumer legally subject to guardianship under the Probate Act 25of 1975, the guardian of the consumer may exercise the rights 26under this Act on the consumer's behalf.  SB0340 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    (4) A consumer may designate another person as the 2consumer's authorized agent to exercise the consumer's right 3to opt out of the processing of the consumer's personal data 4for purposes of targeted advertising and sale under subsection 5(c)(1) on the consumer's behalf. A consumer may designate an 6authorized agent by way of, among other things, a technology, 7including, but not limited to, an Internet link or a browser 8setting, browser extension, or global device setting, 9indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the processing. 10A controller shall comply with an opt-out request received 11from an authorized agent if the controller is able to verify, 12with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the 13consumer and the authorized agent's authority to act on the 14consumer's behalf.15    (c)(1) Universal opt-out mechanisms. A controller must 16allow a consumer to opt out of any processing of the consumer's 17personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, 18profiling in furtherance of automated decisions that produce 19legal effects concerning the consumer or any sale of the 20consumer's personal data through an opt-out preference signal 21sent, with the consumer's consent, by a platform, technology, 22or mechanism to the controller indicating the consumer's 23intent to opt out of the processing, profiling, or sale. The 24platform, technology, or mechanism must:25        (A) not unfairly disadvantage another controller;26        (B) not make use of a default setting but require the   SB0340 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    consumer to make an affirmative, freely given, and 2    unambiguous choice to opt out of the processing of the 3    consumer's personal data; 4        (C) be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the 5    average consumer;6        (D) be as consistent as possible with any other 7    similar platform, technology, or mechanism required by any 8    federal or State law or regulation; and9        (E) enable the controller to accurately determine 10    whether the consumer is an Illinois resident and whether 11    the consumer has made a legitimate request to opt out of 12    any sale of the consumer's personal data profiling in 13    furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal 14    effects concerning the consumer, or targeted advertising. 15    For purposes of this paragraph, the use of an Internet 16    protocol address to estimate the consumer's location is 17    sufficient to determine the consumer's residence.18    (2) If a consumer's opt-out request is exercised through 19the platform, technology, or mechanism required under 20subsection (c)(1), and the request conflicts with the 21consumer's existing controller-specific privacy setting or 22voluntary participation in a controller's bona fide loyalty, 23rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card program, 24the controller must comply with the consumer's opt-out 25preference signal but may also notify the consumer of the 26conflict and provide the consumer a choice to confirm the   SB0340 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1controller-specific privacy setting or participation in the 2controller's program.3    (3) A controller that recognizes opt-out preference 4signals that have been approved by other state laws or 5regulations is in compliance with this subdivision.6    (d)(1) Controller response to consumer requests. Except as 7provided in this Act, a controller must comply with a request 8to exercise the rights pursuant to subsection (a).9    (2) A controller must provide one or more secure and 10reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise 11the consumer's rights under this Section. The means made 12available must take into account the ways in which consumers 13interact with the controller and the need for secure and 14reliable communication of the requests.15    (3) A controller may not require a consumer to create a new 16account to exercise a right, but a controller may require a 17consumer to use an existing account to exercise the consumer's 18rights under this Section.19    (4) A controller must comply with a request to exercise 20the rights under this Section as soon as feasibly possible, 21but no later than 45 days after the receipt of the request, 22unless the controller extends the time.23    (5) A controller must inform a consumer of any action 24taken on a request under subsection (b) without undue delay 25and in any event within 45 days after the receipt of the 26request. That period may be extended once by 45 additional   SB0340 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1days where reasonably necessary taking into account the 2complexity and number of the requests. The controller must 3inform the consumer of any extension within the original 445-day window, together with the reasons for the delay.5    (6) If a controller does not take action on a consumer's 6request, the controller must inform the consumer without undue 7delay and at the latest within 45 days after the receipt of the 8request of the reasons for not taking action and instructions 9for how to appeal the decision with the controller as 10described in subsection (e).11    (7) Information provided under this Section must be 12provided by the controller free of charge up to twice annually 13to the consumer. If requests from a consumer are manifestly 14unfounded or excessive, in particular because of the 15repetitive character of the requests, the controller may 16either charge a reasonable fee to cover the administrative 17costs of complying with the request or refuse to act on the 18request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the 19manifestly unfounded or excessive character of the request.20    (8) A controller is not required to comply with a request 21to exercise any of the rights under subsection (a), paragraphs 22(2) to (5) and (8), if the controller is unable to authenticate 23the request using commercially reasonable efforts. In such 24cases, the controller may request the provision of additional 25information reasonably necessary to authenticate the request. 26A controller is not required to authenticate an opt-out   SB0340 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the 2controller has a good faith, reasonable, and documented belief 3that the request is fraudulent. If a controller denies an 4opt-out request because the controller believes a request is 5fraudulent, the controller must notify the person who made the 6request that the request was denied because of the 7controller's belief that the request was fraudulent and state 8the controller's basis for that belief.9    (9) In response to a consumer request under subsection 10(b), a controller must not disclose the following information 11about a consumer but must instead inform the consumer with 12sufficient particularity that the controller has collected 13that type of information:14        (A) Social Security number;15        (B) driver's license number or other government-issued 16    identification number;17        (C) financial account number;18        (D) health insurance account number or medical 19    identification number;20        (E) account password, security questions, or answers; 21    or22        (F) biometric identifiers or information.23    (10) In response to a consumer request under subsection 24(b), a controller is not required to reveal any trade secret.25    (11) A controller that has obtained personal data about a 26consumer from a source other than the consumer may comply with   SB0340 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1a consumer's request to delete the consumer's personal data 2pursuant to subsection (a), paragraph (4), by either:3        (A) retaining a record of the deletion request, 4    retaining the minimum data necessary for the purpose of 5    ensuring the consumer's personal data remains deleted from 6    the business's records and not using the retained data for 7    any other purpose under the provisions of this Act; or8        (B) opting the consumer out of the processing of 9    personal data for any purpose except for the purposes 10    exempted pursuant to the provisions of this Act.11    (e)(1) Appeal process required. A controller must 12establish an internal process in which a consumer may appeal a 13refusal to take action on a request to exercise any of the 14rights under subsection (a) within a reasonable period of time 15after the consumer's receipt of the notice sent by the 16controller under subsection (d), paragraph (6).17    (2) The appeal process must be conspicuously available. 18The process must include the ease of use provisions in 19subsection (c)(1) applicable to submitting requests.20    (3) Within 45 days after the receipt of an appeal, a 21controller must inform the consumer of any action taken or not 22taken in response to the appeal along with a written 23explanation of the reasons in support thereof. That period may 24be extended by 60 additional days if reasonably necessary, 25taking into account the complexity and number of the requests 26serving as the basis for the appeal. The controller must   SB0340 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1inform the consumer of any extension within 45 days after the 2receipt of the appeal together with the reasons for the delay.3    (4) When informing a consumer of any action taken or not 4taken in response to an appeal pursuant to paragraph (3), the 5controller must provide a written explanation of the reasons 6for the controller's decision and clearly and prominently 7provide the consumer with information about how to file a 8complaint with the Attorney General. The controller must 9maintain records of all appeals and the controller's responses 10for at least 24 months and shall, upon written request by the 11Attorney General as part of an investigation, compile and 12provide a copy of the records to the Attorney General. 13    Section 15. Processing deidentified data or pseudonymous 14data. 15    (a) This Act does not require a controller or processor to 16do any of the following solely for purposes of complying with 17this Act:18        (1) reidentify deidentified data;19        (2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, 20    obtain, retain, or access any data or technology, to be 21    capable of associating an authenticated consumer request 22    with personal data; or23        (3) comply with an authenticated consumer request to 24    access, correct, delete, or port personal data under 25    Section 14, subsection (a), if all of the following are   SB0340 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    true:2            (A) the controller is not reasonably capable of 3        associating the request with the personal data, or it 4        would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to 5        associate the request with the personal data;6            (B) the controller does not use the personal data 7        to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who 8        is the subject of the personal data or associate the 9        personal data with other personal data about the same 10        specific consumer; and11            (C) the controller does not sell the personal data 12        to any third party or otherwise voluntarily disclose 13        the personal data to any third party other than a 14        processor, except as otherwise permitted in this 15        Section.16    (b) The rights contained in paragraphs (2) to (5) and (8) 17of subsection (a) of Section 14 do not apply to pseudonymous 18data in cases in which the controller is able to demonstrate 19any information necessary to identify the consumer is kept 20separately and is subject to effective technical and 21organizational controls that prevent the controller from 22accessing the information.23    (c) A controller that transfers, sells, or otherwise 24discloses pseudonymous data or deidentified data must exercise 25reasonable oversight to monitor compliance with any 26contractual commitments to which the pseudonymous data or   SB0340 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1deidentified data are subject, and must take appropriate steps 2to address any breaches of contractual commitments.3    (d) A processor or third party must not attempt to 4identify the subjects of deidentified or pseudonymous data 5without the express authority of the controller that caused 6the data to be deidentified or pseudonymized.7    (e) A controller, processor, or third party must not 8attempt to identify the subjects of data that has been 9collected with only pseudonymous identifiers. 10    Section 16. Responsibilities of controllers. 11    (a)(1) Transparency obligations. Controllers must provide 12consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear, and meaningful 13privacy notice that includes:14        (A) the categories of personal data processed by the 15    controller;16        (B) the purposes for which the categories of personal 17    data are processed;18        (C) an explanation of the rights contained in Section 19    14 and how and where consumers may exercise those rights, 20    including how a consumer may appeal a controller's action 21    with regard to the consumer's request;22        (D) the categories of personal data that the 23    controller sells to or shares with third parties, if any;24        (E) the categories of third parties, if any, with whom 25    the controller sells or shares personal data;  SB0340 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (F) the controller's contact information, including an 2    active email address or other online mechanism that the 3    consumer may use to contact the controller;4        (G) a description of the controller's retention 5    policies for personal data; and6        (H) the date the privacy notice was last updated.7    (2) If a controller sells personal data to third parties, 8processes personal data for targeted advertising, or engages 9in profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal 10effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant effects 11concerning a consumer, the controller must disclose the 12processing in the privacy notice and provide access to a clear 13and conspicuous method outside the privacy notice for a 14consumer to opt out of the sale, processing, or profiling in 15furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects concerning 16a consumer or similarly significant effects concerning a 17consumer. This method may include but is not limited to an 18Internet hyperlink clearly labeled "Your Opt-Out Rights" or 19"Your Privacy Rights" that directly effectuates the opt-out 20request or takes consumers to a web page where the consumer can 21make the opt-out request.22    (3) The privacy notice must be made available to the 23public in each language in which the controller provides a 24product or service that is subject to the privacy notice or 25carries out activities related to the product or service.26    (4) The controller must provide the privacy notice in a   SB0340 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1manner that is reasonably accessible to and usable by 2individuals with disabilities.3    (5) Whenever a controller makes a material change to the 4controller's privacy notice or practices, the controller must 5notify consumers affected by the material change with respect 6to any prospectively collected personal data and provide a 7reasonable opportunity for consumers to withdraw consent to 8any further materially different collection, processing, or 9transfer of previously collected personal data under the 10changed policy. The controller shall take all reasonable 11electronic measures to provide notification regarding material 12changes to affected consumers, taking into account available 13technology and the nature of the relationship.14    (6) A controller is not required to provide a separate 15Illinois-specific privacy notice or section of a privacy 16notice if the controller's general privacy notice contains all 17the information required by this Section.18    (7) The privacy notice must be posted online through a 19conspicuous hyperlink using the word "privacy" on the 20controller's website home page or on a mobile application's 21app store page or download page. A controller that maintains 22an application on a mobile or other device shall also include a 23hyperlink to the privacy notice in the application's settings 24menu or in a similarly conspicuous and accessible location. A 25controller that does not operate a website shall make the 26privacy notice conspicuously available to consumers through a   SB0340 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1medium regularly used by the controller to interact with 2consumers, including, but not limited to, mail.3    (b)(1) Use of data. A controller shall:4        (A) limit the collection of personal data to what is 5    adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation 6    to the purposes for which the data are processed, which 7    must be disclosed to the consumer;8        (B) not collect, process, or share sensitive data 9    concerning a consumer except when such collection, 10    processing, or transfer is strictly necessary to provide 11    or maintain a specific product or service requested by the 12    consumer to whom the sensitive data pertains. For purposes 13    of this Act, the collection and processing of specific 14    geolocation data or personal data to provide 15    transportation services by private entities regulated 16    under the Transportation Network Providers Act, is 17    strictly necessary to the extent that the private entity 18    uses the geolocation data or personal data for the sole 19    purpose of providing a service requested by the individual 20    or the use is otherwise consistent with that individual's 21    reasonable expectations considering the context in which 22    the individual provided the geolocation information to the 23    private entity. For purposes of this Act, the collection, 24    processing, and sharing of biometric identifiers and 25    information must be done in accordance with the 26    requirements of the Biometric Information Privacy Act. For   SB0340 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    purposes of this Act, the collection, processing, and 2    sharing of genetic information must be done in accordance 3    with the Genetic Information Privacy Act. For purposes of 4    this Act, the collection, processing, and sharing of 5    students' covered information must be done in accordance 6    with the Student Online Personal Protection Act; and7        (C) not sell sensitive data.8    (2) Except as provided in this Act, a controller may not 9process personal data for purposes that are not reasonably 10necessary to, or compatible with, the purposes for which the 11personal data are processed, as disclosed to the consumer, 12unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent.13    (3) A controller shall establish, implement, and maintain 14reasonable administrative, technical, and physical data 15security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, 16and accessibility of personal data, including the maintenance 17of an inventory of the data that must be managed to exercise 18these responsibilities. The data security practices shall be 19appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at 20issue.21    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a controller 22may not process sensitive data concerning a consumer without 23obtaining the consumer's consent, or, in the case of the 24processing of personal data concerning a known child, without 25obtaining consent from the child's parent or lawful guardian, 26in accordance with the requirement of the Children's Online   SB0340 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1Privacy Protection Act, United States Code, Title 15, Sections 26501 to 6506, and its implementing regulations. A controller 3must follow the requirements of the Biometric Information 4Privacy Act and the Genetic Information Privacy Act for 5information covered by those Acts.6    (5) A controller shall provide an effective mechanism for 7a consumer, or, in the case of the processing of personal data 8concerning a known child, the child's parent or lawful 9guardian, to withdraw previously given consent under this 10subsection. The mechanism provided shall be at least as easy 11as the mechanism by which the consent was previously given. 12Upon revocation of consent, a controller shall cease to 13process the applicable data as soon as practicable, but no 14later than 15 days after the receipt of the request.15    (6) A controller may not process the personal data of a 16consumer for purposes of targeted advertising, or sell the 17consumer's personal data, without the consumer's consent, 18under circumstances in which the controller knows that the 19consumer is between the ages of 13 and 16.20    (7) A controller may not retain personal data that is no 21longer relevant and reasonably necessary in relation to the 22purposes for which the data were collected and processed, 23unless retention of the data is otherwise required by law or 24permitted under Section 19 and in accordance with the 25Biometric Information Privacy Act.26    (c)(1) Nondiscrimination. A controller shall not process   SB0340 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1personal data on the basis of a consumer's or a class of 2consumers' actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, 3religion, national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, 4sexual orientation, familial status, lawful source of income, 5or disability in a manner that unlawfully discriminates 6against the consumer or class of consumers.7    (2) A controller may not discriminate against a consumer 8for exercising any of the rights contained in this Act, 9including denying goods or services to the consumer, charging 10different prices or rates for goods or services, and providing 11a different level of quality of goods and services to the 12consumer. This subsection does not: (i) require a controller 13to provide a good or service that requires the consumer's 14personal data that the controller does not collect or 15maintain; or (ii) prohibit a controller from offering a 16different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of goods 17or services to a consumer, including offering goods or 18services for no fee, if the offering is in connection with a 19consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, 20rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card program if 21that difference is reasonably related to the value provided to 22the business by the consumer's data.23    (d) Waiver of rights unenforceable. Any provision of a 24contract or agreement of any kind that purports to waive or 25limit in any way a consumer's rights under this Act is contrary 26to public policy and is void and unenforceable.   SB0340 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Section 17. Requirements for small businesses. 2    (a) A small business, as defined by the United States 3Small Business Administration under the Code of Federal 4Regulations, Title 13, Part 121, that conducts business in 5Illinois or produces products or services that are targeted to 6Illinois residents must not sell a consumer's sensitive data.7    (b) Penalties and enforcement procedures under Section 20 8apply to a small business that violates this Section. 9    Section 18. Data privacy policies; data privacy and 10protection assessments. 11    (a) A controller must document and maintain a description 12of the policies and procedures the controller has adopted to 13comply with this Act. The description must include, where 14applicable:15        (1) the name and contact information for the 16    controller's chief privacy officer or other individual 17    with primary responsibility for directing the policies and 18    procedures implemented to comply with the provisions of 19    this Act; and20        (2) a description of the controller's data privacy 21    policies and procedures that reflect the requirements in 22    Section 16, and any policies and procedures designed to:23            (i) reflect the requirements of this Act in the 24        design of the controller's systems;  SB0340 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1            (ii) identify and provide personal data to a 2        consumer as required by this Act;3            (iii) establish, implement, and maintain 4        reasonable administrative, technical, and physical 5        data security practices to protect the 6        confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of 7        personal data, including the maintenance of an 8        inventory of the data that must be managed to exercise 9        the responsibilities under this item;10            (iv) limit the collection of personal data to what 11        is adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in 12        relation to the purposes for which the data are 13        processed;14            (v) prevent the retention of personal data that is 15        no longer relevant and reasonably necessary in 16        relation to the purposes for which the data were 17        collected and processed, unless retention of the data 18        is otherwise required by law or permitted under 19        Section 19 and in accordance with the Biometric 20        Information Privacy Act; and21            (vi) identify and remediate violations of this 22        Act.23    (b) A controller must conduct and document a data privacy 24and protection assessment for each of the following processing 25activities involving personal data:26        (1) the processing of personal data for purposes of   SB0340 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    targeted advertising;2        (2) the sale of personal data;3        (3) the processing of sensitive data;4        (4) any processing activities involving personal data 5    that present a heightened risk of harm to consumers; and6        (5) the processing of personal data for purposes of 7    profiling, where the profiling presents a reasonably 8    foreseeable risk of:9            (i) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or disparate 10        impact on, consumers;11            (ii) financial, physical, or reputational injury 12        to consumers;13            (iii) a physical or other intrusion upon the 14        solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or 15        concerns, of consumers, where the intrusion would be 16        offensive to a reasonable person; or17            (iv) other substantial injury to consumers.18    (c) A data privacy and protection assessment must take 19into account the type of personal data to be processed by the 20controller, including the extent to which the personal data 21are sensitive data, and the context in which the personal data 22are to be processed.23    (d) A data privacy and protection assessment must identify 24and weigh the benefits that may flow directly and indirectly 25from the processing to the controller, consumer, other 26stakeholders, and the public against the potential risks to   SB0340 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1the rights of the consumer associated with the processing, as 2mitigated by safeguards that can be employed by the controller 3to reduce the potential risks. The use of deidentified data 4and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the 5context of the processing and the relationship between the 6controller and the consumer whose personal data will be 7processed, must be factored into this assessment by the 8controller.9    (e) A data privacy and protection assessment must include 10the description of policies and procedures required by 11subsection (a).12    (f) As part of a subpoena, the Attorney General or State's 13Attorneys may request, in writing, that a controller disclose 14any data privacy and protection assessment that is relevant to 15an investigation conducted by the Attorney General or State's 16Attorneys. The controller must make a data privacy and 17protection assessment available to the Attorney General or 18State's Attorneys upon a request made under this subsection. 19The Attorney General or State's Attorneys may evaluate the 20data privacy and protection assessments for compliance with 21this Act. Data privacy and protection assessments are 22nonpublic data that is required by State or federal law that 23is: (1) not about an individual; (2) not accessible by the 24general public; and (3) accessible by the subject of the data. 25The disclosure of a data privacy and protection assessment 26under a request from the Attorney General or State's Attorneys   SB0340 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1under this subsection does not constitute a waiver of the 2attorney-client privilege or work product protection with 3respect to the assessment and any information contained in the 4assessment.5    (g) Data privacy and protection assessments or risk 6assessments conducted by a controller for the purpose of 7compliance with other laws or regulations may qualify under 8this Section if the assessments have a similar scope and 9effect.10    (h) A single data protection assessment may address 11multiple sets of comparable processing operations that include 12similar activities. 13    Section 19. Limitations and applicability. 14    (a) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 15under this Act do not restrict a controller's or a processor's 16ability to:17        (1) comply with federal, State, or local laws, rules, 18    or regulations, including, but not limited to, data 19    retention requirements in State or federal law 20    notwithstanding a consumer's request to delete personal 21    data;22        (2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory 23    inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, 24    State, local, or other governmental authorities;25        (3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning   SB0340 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    conduct or activity that the controller or processor 2    reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, 3    State, or local laws, rules, or regulations;4        (4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or 5    defend legal claims;6        (5) provide a product or service specifically 7    requested by a consumer; perform a contract to which the 8    consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms of a 9    written warranty; or take steps at the request of the 10    consumer prior to entering into a contract;11        (6) take immediate steps to protect an interest that 12    is essential for the life or physical safety of the 13    consumer or of another natural person, and if the 14    processing cannot be manifestly based on another legal 15    basis;16        (7) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to 17    security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, 18    malicious or deceptive activities, or any illegal 19    activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; 20    or investigate, report, or prosecute those responsible for 21    any such action;22        (8) assist another controller, processor, or third 23    party with any of the obligations under this subsection;24        (9) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, 25    historical, or statistical research in the public interest 26    that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy   SB0340 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    laws and is approved, monitored, and governed by an 2    institutional review board, human subjects research ethics 3    review board, or a similar independent oversight entity 4    that has determined:5            (A) the research is likely to provide substantial 6        benefits that do not exclusively accrue to the 7        controller;8            (B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh 9        the privacy risks; and10            (C) the controller has implemented reasonable 11        safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with 12        research, including any risks associated with 13        reidentification; or14        (10) process personal data for the benefit of the 15    public in the areas of public health, community health, or 16    population health, but only to the extent that the 17    processing is:18            (A) subject to suitable and specific measures to 19        safeguard the rights of the consumer whose personal 20        data is being processed; and21            (B) under the responsibility of a professional 22        individual who is subject to confidentiality 23        obligations under federal, State, or local law.24    (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 25under this Act do not restrict a controller's or processor's 26ability to collect, use, or retain data to:  SB0340 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (1) effectuate a product recall or identify and repair 2    technical errors that impair existing or intended 3    functionality;4        (2) perform internal operations that are reasonably 5    aligned with the expectations of the consumer based on the 6    consumer's existing relationship with the controller, or 7    are otherwise compatible with processing in furtherance of 8    the provision of a product or service specifically 9    requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract 10    to which the consumer is a party; or11        (3) conduct internal research to develop, improve, or 12    repair products, services, or technology.13    (c) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 14under this Act do not apply if compliance by the controller or 15processor with this Act would violate an evidentiary privilege 16under Illinois law and do not prevent a controller or 17processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer 18to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under Illinois 19law as part of a privileged communication.20    (d) A controller or processor that discloses personal data 21to a third-party controller or processor in compliance with 22the requirements of this Act is not in violation of this Act if 23the recipient processes the personal data in violation of this 24Act, provided that at the time of disclosing the personal 25data, the disclosing controller or processor did not have 26actual knowledge that the recipient intended to commit a   SB0340 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1violation. A third-party controller or processor receiving 2personal data from a controller or processor in compliance 3with the requirements of this Act is not in violation of this 4Act for the obligations of the controller or processor from 5which the third-party controller or processor receives the 6personal data.7    (e) Obligations imposed on controllers and processors 8under this Act shall not:9        (1) adversely affect the rights or freedoms of any 10    persons, including exercising the right of free speech 11    pursuant to the First Amendment of the United States 12    Constitution; or13        (2) apply to the processing of personal data by a 14    natural person in the course of a purely personal or 15    household activity.16    (f) Personal data that are processed by a controller 17pursuant to this Section may be processed solely to the extent 18that the processing is:19        (1) necessary, reasonable, and proportionate to the 20    purposes listed in this Section;21        (2) adequate, relevant, and limited to what is 22    necessary in relation to the specific purpose or purposes 23    listed in this Section; and24        (3) insofar as possible, taking into account the 25    nature and purpose of processing the personal data, 26    subjected to reasonable administrative, technical, and   SB0340 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    physical measures to protect the confidentiality, 2    integrity, and accessibility of the personal data, and to 3    reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to consumers.4    (g) If a controller processes personal data pursuant to an 5exemption in this Section, the controller bears the burden of 6demonstrating that the processing qualifies for the exemption 7and complies with the requirements in subsection (f).8    (h) Processing personal data solely for the purposes 9expressly identified in subsection (a), clauses (1) to (7), 10does not, by itself, make an entity a controller with respect 11to the processing. 12    Section 20. Enforcement.13    (a) If a controller or processor violates this Act, the 14Attorney General or the State's Attorney of any county in this 15State, before filing an enforcement action under subsection 16(b), must provide the controller or processor with a warning 17letter identifying the specific provisions of this Act the 18Attorney General or State's Attorney alleges have been or are 19being violated. If, after 30 days of issuance of the warning 20letter, the Attorney General or State's Attorney believes the 21controller or processor has failed to cure any alleged 22violation, the Attorney General or State's Attorney may bring 23an enforcement action under subsection (b). This subsection 24becomes inoperative January 1, 2029.25    (b) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of any   SB0340 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1county in this State may bring an action in the name of the 2People of this State against any person to restrain and 3prevent any pattern or practice in violation of this Act.4    (c) A violation of this Act constitutes an unlawful 5practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 6Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted 7to the Attorney General or the State's Attorney by the 8Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act are 9available to the Attorney General or the State's Attorney for 10the enforcement of this Act.11    (d) Any civil penalties collected from the enforcement of 12this Act shall be deposited into the Attorney General Court 13Ordered and Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund if the 14Attorney General commenced the action or distributed to the 15county in which the State's Attorney commenced the action and 16deposited into a special fund in the county treasury and 17appropriated to the State's Attorney for use in accordance 18with law.19    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to establish a 20private right of action associated with violations of this 21Act.22    (f) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt the 23enforcement provisions in the Biometric Information Privacy 24Act or the Genetic Information Privacy Act.  25    Section 95. Home rule. A unit of local government,   SB0340 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1including a home rule unit, may not regulate consumer data 2privacy. This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 3powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of 4Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 5    Section 97. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 6its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 7the invalidity of that provision or application does not 8affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 9be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 10    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 11changing Section 7.5 as follows: 12    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)13    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-441 and 14104-457)15    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 16by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 17exempt from inspection and copying:18        (a) All information determined to be confidential 19    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 20    Development Act.21        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 22    library users with specific materials under the Library 23    Records Confidentiality Act.  SB0340 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 2    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 3    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 4    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 5    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 6    has received.7        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 8    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 9    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 10    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 11    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 12    Infection Control Act.13        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.15        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 16    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 17    Qualifications Based Selection Act.18        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 19    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 20    Tuition Act.21        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 22    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 23    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 24    general's office that would be exempt if created or 25    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 26    that Act.  SB0340 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 2    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 3    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 4    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.5        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 6    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 7    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.8        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 9    or driver identification information compiled by a law 10    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 11    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.12        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 13    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 14    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 15    Prevention Review Team Act.16        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 17    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 18    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 19    authorized under that Article.20        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 21    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 22    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 23    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 24    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 25    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 26    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.  SB0340 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 2    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 3    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.4        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 5    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 6    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 7    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 8    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 9    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 10    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 11    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 12    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 13    Act (repealed). 14        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 15    Personnel Record Review Act. 16        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 17    Illinois School Student Records Act. 18        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 19    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 20        (t) (Blank). 21        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 22    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 23    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 24        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 25    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 26    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for   SB0340 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 2    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 3    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 4    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 5    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 6    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 7    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 8        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 9    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 10    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.11        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 12    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 13    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.14        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 16    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 17        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 18    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 19    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 20    information about the identity and administrative finding 21    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 22    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 23    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 24    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 25        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 26    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory   SB0340 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 2    Act. 3        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 4    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 5        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 6    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 7        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 8    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 9    authorized under that Act.10        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 11    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 12    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 13        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 14    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 15        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 16    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 17        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 18    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 19    Code. 20        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 21    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 22        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 23    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 24    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 25        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 26    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day   SB0340 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 2    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 3    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 4        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 5    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 6        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 7    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 8    Aid Code. 9        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 10    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 11        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 12    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 13        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 14    arising out of a peer support counseling session 15    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 16    Suicide Prevention Act. 17        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 18    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 19    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 20    Prevention Act. 21        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 22    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 23    under the Reproductive Health Act. 24        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 26        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of   SB0340 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 2    Human Rights Act.3        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 4    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 5    Act. 6        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 7    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 8        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 9    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 10    Public Aid Code. 11        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 12    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 13        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 14    information that shall not be made public under the 15    Illinois Insurance Code. 16        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 17    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.18        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 19    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 20        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 22        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 23    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 24    Police Act. 25        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 26    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil   SB0340 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Administrative Code of Illinois. 2        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 3    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 4    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 5    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 6        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 7    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 8    Violence Fatality Review Act. 9        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 10    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 11    information used and collected by the Illinois State 12    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 13    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 14    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 15    July 1, 2028.16        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 17    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 18    Agency Licensing Act. 19        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 20    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 21    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 22    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 23    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 24    Act. 25        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 26    the School Safety Drill Act.   SB0340 Engrossed- 57 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 2    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 3        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 4    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 5    Act. 6        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 7    2-3.196 of the School Code. 8        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 10    Power Agency Act. 11        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 12    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 13    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 14        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 15    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 16        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 18        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 20        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 22    Modernization Act. 23        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 24    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.25        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 26    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized   SB0340 Engrossed- 58 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    under that Section. 2        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 3    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.4        (www) Data privacy and protection assessments made 5    available to the Attorney General under Section 18 of the 6    Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 7(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 8103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 98-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 10eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 11103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 128-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 13eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 14104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 159-10-25.) 16    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457 but 17before 104-441)18    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 19by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 20exempt from inspection and copying:21        (a) All information determined to be confidential 22    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 23    Development Act.24        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 25    library users with specific materials under the Library   SB0340 Engrossed- 59 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Records Confidentiality Act.2        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 3    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 4    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 5    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 6    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 7    has received.8        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 9    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 10    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 11    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 12    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 13    Infection Control Act.14        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 15    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.16        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 17    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 18    Qualifications Based Selection Act.19        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 20    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 21    Tuition Act.22        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 23    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 24    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 25    general's office that would be exempt if created or 26    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under   SB0340 Engrossed- 60 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    that Act.2        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 3    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 4    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 5    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.6        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 7    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 8    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.9        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 10    or driver identification information compiled by a law 11    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 12    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.13        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 14    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 15    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 16    Prevention Review Team Act.17        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 18    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 19    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 20    authorized under that Article.21        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 22    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 23    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 24    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 25    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 26    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the   SB0340 Engrossed- 61 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.2        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 4    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.5        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 6    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 7    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 8    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 9    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 10    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 11    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 12    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 13    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 14    Act (repealed). 15        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 16    Personnel Record Review Act. 17        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 18    Illinois School Student Records Act. 19        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 20    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 21        (t) (Blank). 22        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 23    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 24    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 25        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 26    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under   SB0340 Engrossed- 62 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 2    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 3    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 4    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 5    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 6    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 7    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 8    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 9        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 10    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 11    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.12        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 13    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 14    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.15        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 16    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 17    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 18        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 19    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 20    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 21    information about the identity and administrative finding 22    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 23    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 24    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 25    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 26        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality   SB0340 Engrossed- 63 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 2    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 3    Act. 4        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 5    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 6        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 7    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 8        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 9    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 10    authorized under that Act.11        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 12    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 13    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 14        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 16        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 17    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 18        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 19    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 20    Code. 21        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 22    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 23        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 24    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 25    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 26        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be   SB0340 Engrossed- 64 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 2    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 3    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 4    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 5        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 6    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 7        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 8    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 9    Aid Code. 10        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 12        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 14        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 15    arising out of a peer support counseling session 16    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 17    Suicide Prevention Act. 18        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 19    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 20    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 21    Prevention Act. 22        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 24    under the Reproductive Health Act. 25        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.   SB0340 Engrossed- 65 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 2    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 3    Human Rights Act.4        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 5    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 6    Act. 7        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 9        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 10    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 11    Public Aid Code. 12        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 14        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 15    information that shall not be made public under the 16    Illinois Insurance Code. 17        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 18    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.19        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 20    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 21        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 23        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 24    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 25    Police Act. 26        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section   SB0340 Engrossed- 66 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 2    Administrative Code of Illinois. 3        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 4    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 5    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 6    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 7        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 9    Violence Fatality Review Act. 10        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 11    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 12    information used and collected by the Illinois State 13    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 14    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 15    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 16    July 1, 2028.17        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 18    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 19    Agency Licensing Act. 20        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 21    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 22    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 23    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 24    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 25    Act. 26        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of   SB0340 Engrossed- 67 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    the School Safety Drill Act. 2        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 3    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 4        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 5    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 6    Act. 7        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 8    2-3.196 of the School Code. 9        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 11    Power Agency Act. 12        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 13    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 14    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 15        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 16    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 17        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 19        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 21        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 23    Modernization Act. 24        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 25    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.26        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the   SB0340 Engrossed- 68 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 2    under that Section. 3        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 4    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.5        (www) Data privacy and protection assessments made 6    available to the Attorney General under Section 18 of the 7    Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 8(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 9103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 108-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 11eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 12103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 138-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 14eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 15104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-457, eff. 166-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 17    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-441)18    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 19by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 20exempt from inspection and copying:21        (a) All information determined to be confidential 22    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 23    Development Act.24        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 25    library users with specific materials under the Library   SB0340 Engrossed- 69 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Records Confidentiality Act.2        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 3    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 4    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 5    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 6    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 7    has received.8        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 9    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 10    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 11    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 12    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 13    Infection Control Act.14        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 15    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.16        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 17    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 18    Qualifications Based Selection Act.19        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 20    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 21    Tuition Act.22        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 23    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 24    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 25    general's office that would be exempt if created or 26    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under   SB0340 Engrossed- 70 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    that Act.2        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 3    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 4    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 5    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.6        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 7    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 8    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.9        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 10    or driver identification information compiled by a law 11    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 12    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.13        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 14    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 15    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 16    Prevention Review Team Act.17        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 18    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 19    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 20    authorized under that Article.21        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 22    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 23    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 24    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 25    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 26    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the   SB0340 Engrossed- 71 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.2        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 4    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.5        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 6    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 7    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 8    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 9    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 10    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 11    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 12    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 13    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 14    Act (repealed). 15        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 16    Personnel Record Review Act. 17        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 18    Illinois School Student Records Act. 19        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 20    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 21        (t) (Blank). 22        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 23    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 24    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 25        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 26    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under   SB0340 Engrossed- 72 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 2    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 3    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 4    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 5    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 6    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 7    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 8    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 9        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 10    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 11    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.12        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 13    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 14    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.15        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 16    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 17    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 18        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 19    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 20    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 21    information about the identity and administrative finding 22    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 23    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 24    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 25    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 26        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality   SB0340 Engrossed- 73 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 2    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 3    Act. 4        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 5    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 6        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 7    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 8        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 9    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 10    authorized under that Act.11        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 12    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 13    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 14        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 16        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 17    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 18        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 19    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 20    Code. 21        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 22    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 23        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 24    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 25    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 26        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be   SB0340 Engrossed- 74 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 2    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 3    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 4    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 5        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 6    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 7        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 8    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 9    Aid Code. 10        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 12        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 14        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 15    arising out of a peer support counseling session 16    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 17    Suicide Prevention Act. 18        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 19    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 20    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 21    Prevention Act. 22        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 24    under the Reproductive Health Act. 25        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.   SB0340 Engrossed- 75 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 2    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 3    Human Rights Act.4        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 5    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 6    Act. 7        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 9        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 10    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 11    Public Aid Code. 12        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 14        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 15    information that shall not be made public under the 16    Illinois Insurance Code. 17        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 18    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.19        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 20    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 21        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 23        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 24    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 25    Police Act. 26        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section   SB0340 Engrossed- 76 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 2    Administrative Code of Illinois. 3        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 4    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 5    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 6    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 7        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 9    Violence Fatality Review Act. 10        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 11    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 12    information used and collected by the Illinois State 13    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 14    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 15    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 16    July 1, 2028.17        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 18    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 19    Agency Licensing Act. 20        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 21    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 22    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 23    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 24    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 25    Act. 26        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of   SB0340 Engrossed- 77 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    the School Safety Drill Act. 2        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 3    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 4        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 5    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 6    Act. 7        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 8    2-3.196 of the School Code. 9        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 11    Power Agency Act. 12        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 13    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 14    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 15        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 16    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 17        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 19        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 21        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 23    Modernization Act. 24        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 25    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.26        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the   SB0340 Engrossed- 78 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 2    under that Section. 3        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 4    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.5        (vvv) (uuu) Information exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 70 of the End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 7    Patients Act.8        (www) Data privacy and protection assessments made 9    available to the Attorney General under Section 18 of the 10    Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 11(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 12103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 138-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 14eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 15103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 168-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 17eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 18104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-441, eff. 199-12-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 20    Section 905. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 21Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 22    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)23    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Illinois Consumer Data 24Privacy Act.  SB0340 Engrossed- 79 -LRB104 06459 JRC 16495 b1    (a) Any person who violates the Illinois Consumer Data 2Privacy Act commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of 3this Act.4    (b) The provisions of Section 10a do not apply to a 5violation of this Section. 6    Section 995. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act 7makes changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by 8text that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a 9Section represented by multiple versions), the use of that 10text does not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the 11changes made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any 12other Public Act. 13    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 141, 2027.